Utah statutes.
48-2c-808.   Actions by multiple managers.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement, where there are multiple managers, on any matter that is to be voted on by the managers:

(1)  the managers may take action without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is signed by all of the managers; and

(2)  the managers may not vote by proxy.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

